Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 3.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201081-1017
Sections; exceptions.

The provisions of sections 81-1008 to 81-1017 shall not apply
to any court or the motor vehicles thereof, but
such vehicles shall be titled as provided in section 81-1013.

Laws 1969, c. 770, § 10, p. 2921;

Laws 1975, LB 474, § 3;

Laws 2010, LB722, § 3.